Alabama, session 2026rs, SB80.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. As a condition of licensing and renewal,
under Article 2 of Chapter 21 of Title 22, Code of Alabama
Page 1

under Article 2 of Chapter 21 of Title 22, Code of Alabama
SB80 INTRODUCED
1975, a hospital in the state with an emergency department,
regardless of classification, must have at least one physician
on duty and physically present who is primarily responsible
for the emergency department at all times that the emergency
department is open.
Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 2